Hawaii statutes.
[§667-85] Neutral qualifications; status and liability. [(a)] A neutral shall possess
sufficient knowledge in the areas of law, real estate, or finance and shall
receive sufficient training to be able to effectuate the purposes of this part.

[(b)] A neutral shall not be liable for any act or omission that occurs
in relation to the administration or operation of the mortgage foreclosure
dispute resolution program. A neutral shall not be a necessary party to,
called as a witness in, or subject to any subpoena duces tecum for the
production of documents in any arbitral, judicial, or administrative proceeding
that arises from or relates to the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution
program. [L 2011, c 48, pt of §1, §45(2); am L 2012, c 182, §49]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next